Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska12-1204
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Unmarked Human Burial Sites and Skeletal Remains Protection Act:

(1) Burial goods shall mean any item or items reasonably believed to have been intentionally placed with the human skeletal remains of an individual at the time of burial and which can be traced with a reasonable degree of certainty to the specific human skeletal remains with which it or they were buried;

(2) Human burial site shall mean the specific place where any human skeletal remains are buried and the immediately surrounding area;

(3) Human skeletal remains shall mean the body or any part of the body of a deceased human in any stage of decomposition;

(4) Indian tribe shall mean any federally recognized or state-recognized Indian tribe, band, or community;

(5) Professional archaeologist shall mean a person having a postgraduate degree in archaeology, anthropology, history, or a related field with a specialization in archaeology and with demonstrated ability to design and execute an archaeological study and to present the written results and interpretations of such a study in a thorough, scientific, and timely manner;

(6) Reasonably identified and reasonably identifiable shall mean identifiable, by a preponderance of the evidence, as to familial or tribal origin based on any available archaeological, historical, ethnological, or other direct or circumstantial evidence or expert opinion;

(7) Society shall mean the Nebraska State Historical Society; and

(8) Unmarked human burial shall mean any interment by whatever means of human skeletal remains for which there exists no grave marker, including burials located in abandoned or neglected cemeteries.

Laws 1989, LB 340, § 4;

Laws 2008, LB995, § 9.